Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
457A

NURSE
AIDES

Section

457A-1 Findings and purpose

457A-1.5 Definitions

457A-2 Implementation

457A-3 Power of director

457A-4 Contract for administrative services

457A-5 Fees

457A-6 Certification required

457A-7 Medicare or medicaid nurse aide
certification

457A-8 Nurse aide certification for
state-licensed or

state-certified health care settings

Cross References

Sunset evaluations modified, see §§26H-4 and 26H-5.

Nursing facility sustainability program, see chapter 346F.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next